Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-3,201
Motor Carrier Division Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

There is hereby created the Motor Carrier Division Cash Fund. Such fund shall be used by the Division of Motor Carrier Services of the department to carry out the operations of the division including the administration of titling and registering vehicles in interjurisdiction commerce and its duties pursuant to section 66-1415. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Motor Carrier Division Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 201;

Laws 2025, LB264, § 138.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.